zh-TW: 相機和光學元件 > 攝影器材 > 照明與攝影棚: 測光表配件; 測光計; 攝影棚背幕; 攝影棚照明配件; 攝影棚照明控制; 攝影棚燈具/閃光燈; 攝影棚懸臂支架配件; 攝影棚立架/架座
zh-CN: 相机与光学器件 > 照片冲印/摄影棚器材 > 摄影棚器材: 照度计配件; 曝光表; 摄影背景布; 摄影棚灯配件; 摄影棚灯光控制; 摄影室灯光与闪光灯; 摄影棚灯光支架配件; 摄影棚幕布支架
lt-LT: Fotoaparatai ir optika > Fotografija > Apšvietimas ir studija: Eksponometrų priedai; Eksponometrai; Studijų fonai; Studijinių žibintų ir blyksčių priedai; Studijų apšvietimo valdikliai; Studijiniai žibintai ir blykstės; Studijų stovų ir laikiklių priedai; Studijų stovai ir laikikliai
hr-HR: Fotoaparati i optika > Fotografija > Rasvjeta i studio: Pribor za svjetlomjere; Svjetlomjeri; Studijske pozadine; Dodatna oprema za studijska svjetla i bljeskalice; Upravljači za studijsku rasvjetu; Studijska svjetla i bljeskalice; Dodaci za studijske stalke i nosače; Studijski stalci i nosači
fr: Appareils photo, caméras et instruments d’optique > Photographie > Éclairage et studio: Accessoires de posemètres; Posemètres; Arrière-plans de studio; Accessoires de lampes et flashs de studio; Commandes d’éclairage de studio; Lampes studio et flashs; Accessoires de supports et fixations de studio; Supports et fixations de studio
ro-RO: Aparate foto și componente optice > Fotografie > Iluminat și studio: Accesorii pentru exponometre; Exponometre; Fundaluri studio; Accesorii pentru lumini de studio și bliț; Comenzi iluminare studio; Lumini de studio și blițuri; Accesorii pentru suport și stativ pentru studio; Standuri și suporturi pentru studio
bg-BG: Фотоапарати и оптика > Фотография > Осветление и студио: Аксесоари за светломер; Светломери; Студийни фонове; Аксесоари за студийни светлини и светкавици; Управление на студийното осветление; Студийни светлини и светкавици; Стойка за студио и аксесоари за монтаж; Стойки за студийно оборудване
pt-BR: Câmeras e óptica > Fotografia > Iluminação e estúdio: Acessórios para medidor de luz; Fotômetros; Planos de fundo; Acessórios para flash e iluminação de estúdio; Controles de luz; Luzes e flashes de estúdio; Acessórios de montagem e suporte para estúdio; Suportes para equipamento de estúdio
nl: Camera's en optiek > Fotografie > Belichting en studio: Accessoires voor lichtmeter; Belichtingsmeters; Achtergronden; Accessoires voor studiobelichting en flitslicht; Verlichtingsregeling; Studioverlichting en flitsers; Accessoires voor studiostatieven en -bevestigingsmateriaal; Statieven en bevestiging voor belichting
el: Κάμερες & οπτικά συστήματα > Φωτογραφία > Φωτισμός & στούντιο: Αξεσουάρ φωτόμετρων; Φωτόμετρα; Φόντα στούντιο; Αξεσουάρ φωτισμού & φλας στούντιο; Ρυθμίσεις φωτισμού στούντιο; Φώτα & φλας στούντιο; Αξεσουάρ βάσεων & στηριγμάτων στούντιο; Βάσεις & στηρίγματα στούντιο
vi: Máy ảnh & Quang học > Nhiếp ảnh > Chiếu sáng và studio: Phụ kiện máy đo cường độ ánh sáng; Máy đo ánh sáng; Phông nền studio; Phụ kiện đèn nháy và ánh sáng cho phòng chụp ảnh; Bộ điều khiển ánh sáng phòng chụp ảnh; Đèn chiếu sáng & đèn flash studio; Phụ kiện treo và giá cho phòng chụp ảnh; Giá đỡ & Chân đế studio
hu: Fényképezőgépek és optikák > Fényképezés > Világítás és stúdió: Fénymérő-kiegészítők; Fénymérők; Stúdióhátterek; Stúdiófény- és -vaku-kiegészítők; Stúdióvilágítás-vezérlők; Stúdiófények és -vakuk; Stúdióállvány és -rögzítő-kiegészítők; Stúdióállványok és -rögzítők
tr: Kameralar ve Optik Malzemeler > Fotoğrafçılık > Işıklandırma ve Stüdyo: Işıkölçer Aksesuarları; Işıkölçerler; Fonlar; Stüdyo Işığı ve Flaşı Aksesuarları; Işık Kumandaları; Stüdyo Işık ve Flaşları; Stüdyo Standı ve Montaj Düzeneği Aksesuarları; Stüdyo Standları ve Bağlantıları
nb: Kameraer og optikk > Fotografering > Belysning og studio: Lysmålertilbehør; Lysmålere; Studiobakgrunner; Tilbehør til studiolys og blits; Kontrollere for studiolys; Studiolys og blitser; Tilbehør til studiostativer og -fester; Studiostativer og -fester
fi: Kamerat ja optiikka > Valokuvaus > Valaistus ja studio: Valotusmittareiden lisätarvikkeet; Valotusmittarit; Studiotaustat; Studiovalaisin- ja -salamatarvikkeet; Studiovalaistuksen hallinta; Studiovalot ja -salamat; Studiotelineiden lisätarvikkeet; Studiotelineet ja asennustelineet
en: Cameras & Optics > Photography > Lighting & Studio: Light Meter Accessories; Light Meters; Studio Backgrounds; Studio Light & Flash Accessories; Studio Lighting Controls; Studio Lights & Flashes; Studio Stand & Mount Accessories; Studio Stands & Mounts
pt-PT: Câmaras e ótica > Fotografia > Iluminação e estúdio: Acessórios de medição de luz; Medidores de luz; Fundos de estúdio; Acessórios de flash e iluminação de estúdio; Controlos de iluminação de estúdio; Flashes e luzes de estúdio; Acessórios de suporte e montagem de estúdio; Suportes e apoios de estúdio
pl: Aparaty, kamery i przyrządy optyczne > Fotografia > Oświetlenie i studio: Akcesoria do światłomierzy; Światłomierze; Tła; Oświetlenie studyjne i akcesoria oświetleniowe; Kontrolery oświetlenia; Oświetlenie studyjne; Stojaki pod monitory studyjne i akcesoria do montażu; Stojaki i uchwyty studyjne
de: Kameras & Optik > Fotografie > Beleuchtung & Studiobedarf: Zubehör für Belichtungsmesser; Belichtungsmesser; Studiohintergründe; Zubehör für Studiobeleuchtung & Blitzgeräte; Lichtsteuerung; Studioscheinwerfer & -blitzgeräte; Zubehör für Studioständer & -halterungen; Studio-Halterungen
it: Fotocamere/dispositivi ottici > Fotografia > Illuminazione e studio: Accessori esposimetri; Esposimetri; Sfondi da studio; Accessori per luci e flash da studio; Controlli per luci da studio; Luci e flash da studio; Accessori per supporti e basi da studio; Supporti e sostegni da studio
sl-SI: Fotoaparati in optika > Fotografija > Osvetlitev in fotografski studio: Dodatki za svetlomere; Svetlomeri; Ozadja za fotografski studio; Dodatki za studijske luči in bliskavice; Krmilniki studijske razsvetljave; Studijske luči in bliskavice; Dodatki za studijska stojala in nosilce; Studijska stojala in nosilci
ja: カメラ・光学機器 > 写真 > 照明・スタジオ: 露出計アクセサリー; 露出計; 背景・バックドロップ; スタジオ用ライト・フラッシュ関連用品; 露出コントロール; スタジオ用ライト・フラッシュ; スタジオ用スタンド・マウント関連用品; スタジオ用マウント
ru: Камеры и оптика > Фотография > Освещение и оборудование для студий: Аксессуары для экспонометров; Экспонометры; Фоны для студий; Аксессуары для осветительных приборов и вспышек; Оборудование для управления освещением; Осветительные приборы и вспышки; Аксессуары для стоек и креплений для осветительного оборудования; Стойки и крепления для осветительного оборудования
es: Cámaras y ópticas > Fotografía > Iluminación y estudio: Accesorios para fotómetros; Fotómetros; Fondos; Accesorios para flash e iluminación de estudio; Controles de iluminación; Flashes e iluminaciones de estudio; Accesorios para bases y plataformas de estudio; Montajes de estudio
sv: Kameror och optik > Fotografi > Ljussättning och studio: Tillbehör till ljusmätare; Ljusmätare; Bakgrunder; Tillbehör till studiolampor och -blixtar; Ljuskontroller; Studiolampor och blixtar; Tillbehör till studiostativ- och fästen; Studiofästen och -stativ
ko: 카메라/광학 기기 > 사진 > 조명/스튜디오: 노출계 부대용품; 노출계; 스튜디오 배경; 스튜디오 조명/플래시 부대용품; 스튜디오 조명 제어기; 스튜디오 조명/플래시; 스튜디오 스탠드/거치대 부대용품; 스튜디오용 스탠드/마운트
th: กล้องและออปติก > การถ่ายภาพ > แสงและสตูดิโอ: อุปกรณ์มิเตอร์วัดแสง; เครื่องวัดแสงไฟ; พื้นหลังสตูดิโอ; อุปกรณ์ไฟและแฟลชสำหรับสตูดิโอ; ตัวควบคุมไฟสตูดิโอ; ไฟและแฟลชสตูดิโอ; อุปกรณ์สำหรับยึดและขาตั้งในสตูดิโอ; ขาตั้งไฟและอุปกรณ์สตูดิโอ
cs: Foto, video a optika > Fotografování > Osvětlení a studiové vybavení: Expozimetry – příslušenství; Expozimetry; Pozadí; Příslušenství ke studiovému osvětlení; Ovládání studiového osvětlení; Studiová světla a blesky; Příslušenství ke studiovým stojanům a držákům; Studiové stojany a držáky
sk-SK: Fotoaparáty a optické zariadenia > Fotografovanie > Osvetlenie štúdia: Príslušenstvo k svetlomerom; Svetlomery; Štúdiové pozadie; Príslušenstvo pre štúdiové osvetlenie a blesk; Ovládanie štúdiového osvetlenia; Štúdiové osvetlenie a blesky; Príslušenstvo pre štúdiové stojany a držiaky; Štúdiové stojany a držiaky
da: Kameraer og optik > Fotografi > Lyssætning og studieoptagelser: Lysmåler – tilbehør; Lysmålere; Baggrunde; Tilbehør til studielys og studieblitz; Lyskontrol; Studielamper og -flash; Tilbehør til studiestativer og studiebeslag; Studiemontering